California statutes. Education Code
 school meals through the federal National School Lunch Program or the federal School Breakfast Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 16.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.6.

Notwithstanding Sections 49076, 49557.3, and 49558, and accompanying regulations, the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services may share data for the limited purpose of administering the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, identifying eligible students and evaluating program outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49558.

(a) All applications and records concerning any individual made or kept by any public officer or agency in connection with the administration of any provision of this code relating to free or reduced-price meal eligibility shall be confidential, and may not be open to examination for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of any free or reduced-price meal program, or any investigation, prosecution, or criminal or civil proceeding conducted in connection with the administration of any free or reduced-price meal program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a public officer or agency may allow school district employees, who are authorized by the governing board of
 the school district, to disclose from the individual meal records only the pupil’s name and school meal eligibility status, solely for purposes of disaggregation of academic achievement data or to identify pupils eligible for public school choice and direct pupil services pursuant to the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), if the public agency ensures the following:

(1) The public agency has adopted a policy that allows for the use of individual records for these purposes.

(2) No individual indicators of participation in any free or reduced-price meal program are maintained in the permanent record of any pupil, unless otherwise allowed by law.

(3) No public release of information
 regarding individual pupil participation in any free or reduced-price meal program is permitted.

(4) All other confidentiality provisions required by law are met.

(5) The information collected regarding individual pupils certified to participate in the free or reduced-price meal program is destroyed when it is no longer needed for its intended purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the school districts and county superintendents of schools may release information on the School Lunch Program application to the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program if the child is approved for free meals and if the applicant consents to the sharing of information pursuant to Section 49557.2.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the school districts and county superintendents of schools may release information on the School Lunch Program application to the local agency that determines eligibility under the CalFresh program or to an agency that determines eligibility for nutrition assistance programs authorized by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 210.1) of Subtitle B of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the child is approved for free or reduced-price meals and if the applicant consents to the sharing of information pursuant to Section 49557.3.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district, charter school, or county office of education may release the name and eligibility status of a pupil participating in the free or reduced-price meal
 program as follows:

(1) To the Superintendent for purposes of determining funding allocations under the local control funding formula and for assessing the accountability of that funding.

(2) Upon request, to another school district, charter school, or county office of education that is serving a pupil living in the same household as an enrolled pupil for purposes related to free or reduced-price meal program eligibility and for data used in local control funding formula calculations.

(f) Information released pursuant to subdivision (c), (d), or (e) shall adhere to all of the following requirements:

(1) Individual indicators of participation in a free or reduced-price
 meal program shall not be maintained in the permanent record of any pupil, unless otherwise authorized by law.

(2) The public release of information regarding individual pupil participation in a free or reduced-price meal program is not permitted.

(3) All other confidentiality requirements imposed by law or regulation are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 10.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49559.

(a) Any school food authority that participates in a federal child nutrition program and is reimbursed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 49501.5 for meals served pursuant to this article may be reimbursed at the current rate as determined by the State Department of Education, pursuant to subdivision (d). If the sum appropriated for purposes of this section is not sufficient to make the allowances specified by this section, the allowances shall be reduced proportionately. This rate shall be in addition to the reimbursement currently provided under Section 49536. The additional funds shall be used exclusively to supplement the meals served pursuant to Section 49501.5.

(b) The State Department of Education shall make
 allowances to school food authorities from the General Fund on at least a quarterly basis. Program providers shall submit claims to the department within 60 days after the close of each claim month. Within 45 calendar days of submission of a timely and valid claim, the State Department of Education shall tender reimbursement.

(c) (1) The State Department of Education shall, upon enactment of the annual Budget Act, prescribe an adjustment in the state meal contribution rates for the next fiscal year. The adjustments shall reflect the changes in the cost of operating a school breakfast, snack, and lunch program and shall be effective July 1 of each year. The adjustment shall be based on the average of the separate indices of the “Food Away From Home Index” for Los Angeles and San Francisco, as prepared by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(2) In
 giving effect to the cost-of-living provisions of this subdivision, the State Department of Education shall prescribe a calendar month for the computation of the percentage change in the cost of living after July 1, 1985. The same month shall be used annually thereafter. The product of any percentage increase or decrease in the average index and the per meal reimbursement disbursement rate shall be adjusted by the amount of any cost-of-living change currently in effect pursuant to this subdivision. For the purposes of this subdivision, state reimbursement shall be made for the breakfast or lunch that qualifies for reimbursement pursuant to the nutritional requirements of Section 49553.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 17.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49560.

The child nutrition programs operated pursuant to Section 49559 shall maintain a data base as specified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of program evaluation. From the funds appropriated in Section 4 of this act, an amount not to exceed 5 percent may be used for administrative expenses incurred by the State Department of Education, including administrative costs incurred in the collection of the data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1482, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

49561.

(a) The department shall create a computerized data matching system using existing databases from the department and the State Department of Health Care Services to directly certify recipients of CalFresh, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids program (the CalWORKs program) (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), and other programs authorized for direct certification under federal law
 for enrollment in the federal National School Lunch Program and the federal School Breakfast Program.

(b) The department shall design a process using an existing agency database that will conform with data from the State Department of Health Care Services to meet the direct certification requirements of the federal National School Lunch Act, as amended, pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1751) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966, as amended, pursuant to Chapter 13A (commencing with Section 1771) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) The department shall design a process using computerized data pursuant to subdivision (a) that will maximize enrollment in school meal programs and improve program
 integrity while ensuring that pupil privacy safeguards remain in place. The State Department of Health Care Services or the department shall conduct the data match of local school records
 to determine program eligibility, as required by federal law. Use of any data by the department in the data match process shall conform with the privacy and confidentiality protections identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(d) (1) Each state agency identified in subdivision (a) is responsible for the maintenance and protection of data received by the respective agency. The state agency that possesses the data shall follow privacy and confidentiality procedures consistent with all applicable state and federal law. Additionally, each state agency involved in the data match process shall amend any applicable existing agreements before the department may conduct
 the data match pursuant to subdivision (c). Before a state agency provides the department with data to conduct a data match, the department and that state agency shall execute a written agreement that outlines the use of the data in the data match process and incorporates privacy and confidentiality procedures consistent with all applicable state and federal law. To the extent permitted by state and federal law, the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may review the data only for the purposes of improving the effectiveness of the data matches made pursuant to this section and Section 49562.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 10850 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, data that identify applicants for, or recipients of, public social services, may be transferred from existing databases maintained by the State Department of Health Care Services,
 in order to directly certify recipients of CalFresh, the CalWORKs program, and other programs authorized for direct certification under federal law, in compliance with subdivision (a). The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(e) The department shall determine the availability of and request or apply for, as appropriate, federal funds to assist the state in implementing new direct certification requirements mandated by federal law.

(f) This section shall become operative upon receipt of federal funds to assist the state in implementing new direct certification requirements mandated by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

49562.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall develop and implement a process to use the participation data from the Medi-Cal program administered pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to verify income as established in the federal Child Nutrition and WIC Reauthorization Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-265) and, to the extent permitted under federal law, directly certify children whose families meet the applicable income criteria into the school meal program.

(b) The department shall share the participation data described in subdivision (a) with local educational
 agencies. A local educational agency that participates in a federal school meal
 program shall use the participation data described in subdivision (a), commencing with the participation data of pupils in the 2017–18 school year, to directly certify pupils eligible for free and reduced-price school meals, to the extent permitted under federal law.

(c) In the operation of this process, the department shall limit the information needed from the State Department of Health Care Services to identify families whose income falls below the eligibility cutoff for free or reduced-price meals, and utilize the least amount of information needed to facilitate a match of local school records. The State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct the data match of local school records and return a list to the department, including only the data fields submitted by the department and an indicator of program
 eligibility, as required by federal law.

(d) The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall design this process to maintain pupil privacy and the privacy of Medi-Cal recipients by establishing privacy and confidentiality procedures consistent with all applicable state and federal laws. Local educational agencies shall maintain pupil privacy and the privacy of Medi-Cal recipients through privacy and confidentiality procedures consistent with applicable state and federal laws. The department and local educational agencies shall utilize appropriate technical and security safeguards to ensure any Medi-Cal participation data is protected, consistent with applicable state and federal laws. To the extent permitted by state and federal law, the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may review the
 data only for the purposes of improving the effectiveness of the data matches made pursuant to this section and Section 49561.

(e) (1) The participation data described in subdivision (a) is exempt from the disclosure requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The participation data described in subdivision (a) shall be used only for the purposes of direct certification pursuant to this section, shall not be open to the public for inspection, and shall not be disclosed to any other party without the written consent of the parent or legal guardian of the pupil, except for the purpose of directly certifying pupils for free and reduced-price meals pursuant to this section or as otherwise required or authorized by law or state or
 federal court order.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit the disclosure of aggregate data that does not reveal personally identifying information about a pupil or a pupil’s family.

(f) The department specifically shall ensure that the process, and use and sharing of participation data from the Medi-Cal program, conforms to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191), the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5) and its implementing regulations, and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), by using strategies employed by other states’ Medicaid verification projects or by
 developing a new strategy that ensures conformity. If applicable, Medi-Cal participation data shall also be subject to Section 49602 and its implementing regulations.

(g) The department shall seek all necessary approvals to establish this process and shall apply for available federal funds to support the work of this process.

(h) This section shall become operative upon the receipt of federal funds to assist the state in implementing the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 72.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Section conditionally operative as provided in its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

49563.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Buy American provision” means the provision requiring a school food authority to purchase, to the maximum extent practicable, domestic commodities or products, as specified in subdivision (n) of Section 1760 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “Domestic” means an agricultural commodity that is produced in the United States and a food product that is processed in the United States using substantial agricultural commodities that are produced in the United States.

(3) “Substantial” means over 51 percent of the final processed
 product consists of agricultural commodities grown domestically.

(4) “School food authority” has the same meaning as defined in Section 210.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) In order to monitor school food authorities’ compliance with the Buy American provision, the department shall
 fulfill its obligations in accordance with the federal regulations.

(c) The department shall make requirements, resources, and best practices for the Buy American provision available on its Internet Web site.

(d) The department shall distribute to school food authorities guidance or regulations from the United States Department of Agriculture for the Buy American provision, as updates are issued.

(e) The
 requirements of this section shall be operative only if mandated by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (SB 730)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49564.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “high-poverty school” is a school that enrolls pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and is eligible to operate under the Community Eligibility Provision, pursuant to Section 1759a of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) In order to provide pupils in high-poverty schools with optimal nutrition for learning and to ensure that schools receive the maximum federal meal reimbursement, a school district or a county superintendent of schools shall provide breakfast and lunch free of charge to all pupils at a high-poverty school pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) On or before June 30, 2022, a school
 district or county superintendent of schools that has a high-poverty school with an identified student percentage of 40 percent or more in its jurisdiction shall apply to operate a federal universal meal service provision, which may include, but is not limited to, the Community Eligibility Provision or Provision 2, pursuant to Section 1759a of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a school district or a county superintendent of schools from participating in a federal universal meal service provision if a high-poverty school in its jurisdiction has an identified student percentage of less than 40 percent.

(3) A school district or county superintendent of schools shall begin providing a universal meal service pursuant to Section 1759a of Title 42 of the United States Code to all pupils at a high-poverty school upon state approval to operate
 a universal meal service.

(c) The department shall provide technical assistance to school districts and county superintendents of schools for the purpose of maximizing the number of schools within each local educational agency to be eligible for the Community Eligibility Provision, pursuant to Section 1759a of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, a charter school shall be considered a high-poverty school only if it participates in the federal National School Lunch Program or the federal School Breakfast Program, or both, and meets the description in subdivision (a). A charter school that is a high-poverty school shall comply with the requirements specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 59.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49564.5.

In order to ensure optimal access to nutrition, facilitate the use of the federal Community Eligibility Provision (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1759a), and further reduce the burden of collecting annual unduplicated pupil income data through free and reduced-price school meal applications, a school district or county superintendent of schools may determine a pupil’s eligibility for free and reduced-price school meals based on data including the direct certification match and alternative measures of poverty pursuant to Section 42238.01 for purposes of the local control funding formula, paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 6313 of Title 20 of the United States Code, and Section 54.505 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. National School Lunch Act [49570. - 49571.]

49570.

Each school district, county superintendent of schools, and other public or private entity that participates in programs under the National School Lunch Act, as amended, and as prescribed by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1751) of Title 42 of the United States Code, may, if consistent with federal law, offer whole milk, in addition to other kinds of milk, if federal regulations require a lunch eligible for federal cash reimbursement under the act to contain unflavored, fluid lowfat milk, skim milk, or buttermilk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 930, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49571.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the state strives to serve National School Lunch Program meals of the highest quality and greatest nutritional value possible.

(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, and contingent upon allocations provided by the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, the department shall provide a state matching grant of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to a school food authority participating in the federal National School Lunch Program that applies for and is awarded a federal Equipment Assistance Grant for School Food Authorities from the department in its administration of the federal National School Lunch Program. The state appropriation shall be for a minimum of two years and shall align with the United States
 Department of Agriculture National School Lunch Program Equipment Grant for School Food Authorities terms and conditions, period of performance, criteria, timelines, and procurement and funding expenditure requirements.

(c) A school food authority may use the federal and state grants for up to five individual schoolsites or may combine the federal and state grants for one purpose, such as creating a centralized industrial kitchen. The state matching assistance grant shall be competitively awarded and shall align with the federal equipment assistance grant requirements pursuant to subdivision (b). Unspent state matching grant funds shall be retained by the department for one or more additional equipment grants, subject to the same requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 71.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Food Recovery Program [49580. - 49581.]

49580.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Food” has the same meaning as in Section 113781 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Food bank” has the same meaning as in Section 113783 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Nonprofit charitable organization” has the same meaning as in Section 113841 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   (SB 557)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49581.

The department shall update its guidance on the donation of leftover food to allow a public school cafeteria to donate food to a food bank or to any other nonprofit charitable organization for distribution to persons free of charge or to make leftover food available to pupils during the course of a regular school meal time that is consistent with Section 114079 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   (SB 557)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. School Nutrition Report  [49590. - 49590.]

49590.

The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California strives to serve food of the highest quality and greatest nutritional value possible. The department shall monitor schools participating in the federal National School Lunch Program or federal School Breakfast Program to ensure that the nutrition levels of meals served to schoolage children qualify those meals for reimbursement under the federal child nutrition program regulations as nutritionally adequate breakfasts and nutritionally adequate lunches, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 49531.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 593, Sec. 7.   (AB 3043)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Educational Counseling [49600. - 49604.]

49600.

(a) The governing board of a school district may, and is urged to, provide access to a comprehensive educational counseling program for all pupils enrolled in the school district. It is the intent of the Legislature that a school district that provides educational counseling to its pupils implement a structured and coherent counseling program within a Multi-Tiered Systems of Support framework.

(b) For purposes of this section, “educational counseling” means specialized services provided
 by a school counselor possessing a valid credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services who directly counsels pupils and implements equitable school programs and services that support pupils in their academic development, social emotional development, and college and career readiness.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that school counselors do all of the following:

(1) Engage with, advocate for, and provide both of the following services for all pupils:

(A) Direct services, including, but not limited to, individual counseling, group counseling, risk assessment, crisis response, and instructional services, including, but not limited to, mental health, behavioral, academic, and postsecondary
 educational services.

(B) Indirect services, including, but not limited to, positive school climate strategies, teacher and parent consultations, and referrals to public and private community services.

(2) Plan, implement, and evaluate comprehensive school counseling programs.

(3) Work within multi-tiered systems of support that use multiple data sources to monitor and improve pupil behavior, attendance, engagement, and achievement.

(4) Develop, coordinate, and supervise comprehensive pupil support systems in collaboration with teachers, administrators, other pupil personnel services professionals, families, community partners, and community agencies, including county mental health agencies.

(5) Promote and maintain a safe learning environment for all pupils by providing restorative practices, positive behavior interventions, and support services, and by developing and responding with a variety of intervention strategies to meet individual, group, and school community needs before, during, and after crisis response.

(6) Intervene to ameliorate school-related problems, including problems related to chronic absences and retention.

(7) Use
 research-based strategies to promote mental wellness, reduce mental health stigma, and identify characteristics, risk factors, and warning signs of pupils who develop, or are at risk of developing, mental health and behavioral disorders and who experience, or are at risk of experiencing, mistreatment, including mistreatment related to any form of conflict or bullying.

(8) Improve school climate and pupil well-being by, including, but not limited to, addressing the mental and behavioral health needs of pupils during their times of transition, separation, heightened stress, and critical changes, and accessing community programs and services to meet those needs.

(9) Enhance pupils’ social and emotional competence, character, health, civic engagement, cultural literacy, and commitment to lifelong
 learning and the pursuit of high-quality educational programs.

(10) Provide counseling services for unduplicated pupils who are classified as English learners, eligible for free or reduced-price meals, or foster youth in a manner that promotes equity and access to appropriate education systems and public and private services.

(11) Engage in continued development as a professional school counselor.

(d) Educational counseling shall include academic counseling and postsecondary services, in the following areas:

(1) Development and implementation, with parental involvement, of the pupil’s immediate and long-range educational plans.

(2) Optimizing progress towards achievement of proficiency standards and competencies.

(3) Completion of the required curriculum in accordance with the pupil’s needs, abilities, interests, and aptitudes.

(4) Academic planning for access and success in higher education programs, including advisement on courses needed for admission to colleges and universities, standardized admissions tests, and financial aid.

(5) Provide high-quality career programs at all grade levels for pupils, in which pupils are assisted in doing all of the following:

(A) Planning for the future, including, but not limited to, identifying
 personal interests, skills, and abilities, career planning, course selection, and career transition.

(B) Becoming aware of personal preferences and interests that influence educational and occupational exploration, career choice, and career success.

(C) Developing work self-efficacy for the ever-changing work environment, the changing needs of the workforce, and the effects of work on the quality of life.

(D) Understanding the relationship between academic achievement and career success, and the importance of maximizing career options.

(E) Understanding the value of participating in career technical education pathways, programs, and certifications, including,
 but not limited to, those related to regional occupational programs and centers, the federal program administered by the United States Department of Labor offering free education and vocational training to pupils, known as “Job Corps,” the California Conservation Corps, work-based learning, industry certifications, college preparation and credit, and employment opportunities.

(F) Understanding the need to develop essential employable skills and work habits.

(G) Understanding entrance requirements to the Armed Forces of the United States, including the benefits of the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery (ASVAB) test.

(e) Educational counseling may also include counseling in any of the following:

(1) Individualized review of the academic and deportment records of a pupil.

(2) Advising pupils, in consultation with their parents and legal
 guardians when at all possible, who are at risk of not promoting or graduating with the rest of their class.

(3) Developing a list of coursework and experience necessary to assist each pupil in middle school to successfully transition to high school and meet all graduation requirements.

(4) In schools that enroll pupils in grades 6 to 12, inclusive, developing a list of coursework and experience necessary to assist
 and counsel each pupil to begin to satisfy the A–G requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University and encourage participation in college preparation programs, including, but not limited to, the Advancement Via Individual Determination (AVID) program, and early college, dual enrollment, advanced placement, and international baccalaureate programs.

(5) Developing pupil knowledge of financial aid planning for postsecondary education by providing pupils with financial aid information, including, but not limited to, information on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA), the California Dream Act application (CADAA), the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3, local and national scholarship
 programs, financial aid programs and resources for foster and homeless youth, fee waiver programs, and other financial aid programs and options, and net college cost.

(6) Providing a copy of the lists developed pursuant to paragraph (4) to a pupil and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, ensuring that the list of coursework and experience is part of the pupil’s cumulative record.

(7) Developing a list of coursework and experience for a pupil enrolled in grade 12, including options for continuing the pupil’s education if the pupil fails to meet graduation requirements. These options shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Enrolling in an adult education program.

(B) Enrolling in a community college.

(C) Continuing enrollment in the pupil’s current school district.

(8) Providing a copy of the list of coursework and experiences developed pursuant to paragraph (7) to the pupil and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, ensuring that the list of coursework and experience is part of the cumulative records of a pupil.

(9) Offering and scheduling an individual conference with each pupil in grades 10 and 12 who has not satisfied, or is not on track to satisfy, the curricular requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University and to successfully transition to postsecondary education or employment, and providing the following information to
 the pupil and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian:

(A) The score of the pupil on the English language arts or mathematics portion of the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33, administered in grade 6, as applicable.

(B) The availability of financial aid for postsecondary education.

(10) Providing mental and behavioral health services to which pupils receive prevention, early intervention, and short-term counseling services and receive classroom instruction in mental health to reduce stigma and increase awareness of counseling support services.

(11) Providing training to school staff to recognize mental health warning signs.

(f) This section does not prohibit persons participating in an organized advisory program approved by the governing board of a school district, and supervised by a school district counselor, from advising pupils pursuant to the organized advisory program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   (AB 2508)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49601.

(a) The State Department of Education shall, no later than December 31, 1986, develop a career guidance model for science and technology for use in school district counseling programs, and shall make the model available to the governing boards of all school districts in this state.

(b) The model shall be designed to provide information for use in career guidance offered to pupils in grades 7 through 12, regarding the potential for employment, educational requirements, and other matters pertaining to careers in the fields of science and technology. The purposes of the model shall be to objectively acquaint pupils with the option of pursuing careers in those fields, and to advise them in a timely manner of the preparation necessary to undertaking those careers.

(c) In developing the model, the State Department of Education shall employ materials and other resources that are available from public and private organizations, to the extent appropriate for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

49602.

Any information of a personal nature disclosed by a pupil 12 years of age or older in the process of receiving counseling from a school counselor as specified in Section 49600 is confidential. Any information of a personal nature disclosed to a school counselor by a parent or guardian of a pupil who is 12 years of age or older and who is in the process of receiving counseling from a school counselor as specified in Section 49600 is confidential. The information shall not become part of the pupil record, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 49061, without the written consent of the person who disclosed the confidential information. The information shall not be revealed, released, discussed, or referred to, except as follows:

(a) Discussion with psychotherapists as defined by Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, other health care providers, or the school nurse, for the sole purpose of referring the pupil for treatment.

(b) Reporting of child abuse or neglect as required by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11165) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Reporting information to the principal or parents of the pupil when the school counselor has reasonable cause to believe that disclosure is necessary to avert a clear and present danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the pupil or the following other persons living in the school community: administrators, teachers, school staff, parents, pupils, and other school community members.

(d) Reporting information to the principal, other persons inside the school, as necessary, the parents of the pupil, and other persons outside the school when the pupil indicates that a crime, involving the likelihood of personal injury or significant or substantial property losses, will be or has been committed.

(e) Reporting information to one or more persons specified in a written waiver after this written waiver of confidence is read and signed by the pupil and preserved in the pupil’s file.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a school counselor shall not disclose information deemed to be confidential pursuant to this section to the parents of the pupil when the school counselor has reasonable cause to believe that the disclosure would result in a clear and present danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the pupil.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a school counselor shall disclose information deemed to be confidential pursuant to this section to law enforcement agencies when ordered to do so by order of a court of law, to aid in the investigation of a crime, or when ordered to testify in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit access to pupil records as provided in Section 49076.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the counselor from conferring with other school staff, as appropriate, regarding modification of the pupil’s academic program.

It is the intent of the Legislature that counselors use the privilege of confidentiality under this section to assist the pupil whenever possible to communicate more effectively with parents, school staff, and others.
